Washington statutes.
RCW 40.10.010

Essential records—Designation—List—Security and protection—Reproduction.

In order to provide for the continuity and preservation of civil government, each elected and appointed officer of the state shall designate those public documents which are essential records of his or her office and needed in an emergency and for the reestablishment of normal operations after any such emergency. A list of such records shall be forwarded to the state archivist on forms prescribed by the state archivist. This list shall be reviewed at least annually by the elected or appointed officer to insure its completeness. Any changes or revisions following this review shall be forwarded to the state archivist. Each such elected and appointed officer of state government shall insure that the security of essential records of his or her office is by the most economical means commensurate with adequate protection. Protection of essential records may be by vaulting, planned or natural dispersal of copies, or any other method approved by the state archivist. Reproductions of essential records may be by photo copy, magnetic tape, microfilm, or other method approved by the state archivist. Local government offices may coordinate the protection of their essential records with the state archivist as necessary to provide continuity of local government under emergency conditions.

[ 2011 c 336 s 816; 1982 c 36 s 1; 1973 c 54 s 1; 1963 c 241 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 c 54: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 c 54 s 6.]